Missouri, session 2026, HB3283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 105, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 105.515, to read as follows:
105.515. 1. Within thirty days after a labor organization has been designated as
the exclusive bargaining representative for the public employees in a bargaining unit,
representatives of the public body, designated by the public body, and representatives of
the labor organization, selected by the labor organization, shall meet and begin
bargaining in good faith for an agreement covering the wages, benefits, and other terms
and conditions of employment for the public employees within the bargaining unit.
2. The labor organization and the public body shall engage in good faith
bargaining with each other's designated representatives.
3. (1) In the event that an agreement cannot be reached within one hundred
eighty days after a labor organization is designated as the exclusive bargaining
representative for the public employees in a bargaining unit, the dispute shall be
referred to mediation pursuant to this subsection.
(2) Within fourteen days after the period in subdivision (1) of this subsection has
expired, the parties shall mutually agree on a neutral mediator selected from a panel of
neutrals from the United States District Court of either the Western or Eastern District
of Missouri. If the parties cannot agree on a neutral mediator within fourteen days, the
matter shall be referred to the board and the board shall assign a mediator.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 3283 & 3306 2
(3) If, after the dispute has been referred to a mediator, whether the neutral
mediator or the state board of mediation, the dispute has not been resolved within
ninety days, the dispute shall be referred to arbitration through an arbitrator as selected
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section.
(4) Upon mutual agreement of the parties, the obligation to submit the matter to
mediation pursuant to this subsection may be waived and the matter may be
immediately submitted to interest arbitration in accordance with subsection 4 of this
section.
4. (1) At any time during the bargaining process, if either the labor organization
or the public body determines an impasse has been reached over wages, benefits, hours,
or other terms and conditions of employment, the party may submit the matter to
interest arbitration.
(2) If the parties agree that an impasse has been reached, within seven days of
such decision, the public body and labor organization shall attempt to agree upon an
impartial arbitrator to resolve the impasse.
(3) If an arbitrator cannot be agreed upon within such time period, the party
that made the initial determination of impasse or, if agreement was not reached and
mediation was unsuccessful or waived, the labor organization, shall request a panel of
seven arbitrators from the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service (FMCS) or, if the
FMCS cannot produce a panel of seven arbitrators, the American Arbitration
Association (AAA). The parties shall alternate striking from the panel one arbitrator
at a time until a single arbitrator is left, with the party that requested the panel striking
first. The party striking first shall have an affirmative duty to notify the board that the
matter has been referred to interest arbitration pursuant to this subsection.
(4) Once an arbitrator has been selected pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3) of this
subsection, the parties shall proceed to resolve whether the matter will be presented to
the arbitrator as a total package, issue by issue, or a combination of both. If the parties
fail to agree upon a method of presentation to the arbitrator, a prehearing conference
shall be held at which each party shall present its position to the arbitrator and the
arbitrator shall then determine the method of presentation. If the parties cannot
mutually agree upon a date to present their respective arguments, the arbitrator shall
set a hearing date at which the labor organization and public body shall each be
afforded the opportunity to present its respective case, including a presentation of
evidence, data, and testimony, in support of its proposal. The arbitrator shall consider
the evidence and render a decision within forty-five days. If the parties do not agree an
impasse has been reached, in a singular hearing, the arbitrator shall hear both the
procedural and substantive arguments of the parties. Before the arbitrator can render a

HCS HBs 3283 & 3306 3
decision on the parties' substantive arguments, the arbitrator shall first determine
whether an impasse has been reached. The decision of the arbitrator shall be binding
upon the parties, provided that any provision that would require the enactment of law
for its implementation shall not be binding until such time as the law is enacted.
(5) All proceedings before the board and the arbitrator shall be recorded with a
written transcript being available to each party. The costs of the arbitrator and court
reporter shall be borne by both parties equally. Any attorney's fees accrued by any
party shall be the responsibility of the party accruing the same.
5. For all successor collective bargaining agreements, if at any time during the
bargaining process either the labor organization or the public body determines an
impasse has been reached over wages, benefits, hours, or other terms and conditions of
employment or a successor agreement is not achieved within one hundred eighty days
after the expiration of the predecessor collective bargaining agreement, either party
may submit the matter to interest arbitration in accordance with subdivision (1) of
subsection 4 of this section. Upon submission to interest arbitration, the arbitrator shall
be selected and the matter shall be handled pursuant to subdivisions (2), (3), and (4) of
subsection 4 of this section.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "good faith" includes, but is not limited
to, approaching negotiations with a sincere intention to reach an agreement, meeting at
reasonable times, dealing with the respective parties in an honest and open manner, and
matching unacceptable proposals with sincere counter-proposals with the sincere intent
to reach an agreement. Acting in good faith includes more than a perfunctory
performance of an obligation to meet and confer with the requisite parties.
7. If, at any time during the bargaining process for an initial contract as set forth
in subsections 1 and 3 of this section or for successor contracts as set forth in subsection
5 of this section, either the labor organization or public body believes the opposing party
has engaged in bad faith bargaining in violation of subsection 2 of this section, it may
submit the matter to the board for determination. If the board determines a party has
engaged in bad faith bargaining in violation of subsection 2 of this section, it shall refer
the matter to interest arbitration in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (3) to
(5) of subsection 4 of this section.
8. At no time after a labor organization has been designated as the exclusive
bargaining representative for the public employees in a bargaining unit, or after an
agreement covering the wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment
for public employees within a bargaining unit has expired, shall the public body make
any unilateral changes to wages, benefits, or other terms and conditions of employment
subject to mandatory bargaining. Any such unilateral changes shall be considered a

HCS HBs 3283 & 3306 4
failure to bargain in good faith. If the labor organization believes that the public body
has made unilateral changes to wages, benefits, or other terms and conditions of
employment subject to mandatory bargaining, the labor organization may seek
declaratory relief, injunctive relief, and monetary damages arising from the unlawful
unilateral change in an appropriate state or federal court.
9. The board may promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
100 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
101 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
102 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
103 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
104 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
105 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔